Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.10.090

Effect of amendment of articles of incorporation.

An amendment to articles of incorporation does not affect a cause of action existing against or in favor of the corporation, a proceeding to which the corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than shareholders of the corporation. An amendment changing a corporation's name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against the corporation in its former name.

[ 1989 c 165 s 128.]